Connecticut, session 2026, HB05395.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Modular or prefabricated home" or "unit" means a completely
assembled and erected building or structure containing one dwelling
unit, as defined in section 47a-1 of the general statutes, including
prefabricated unit service equipment, of which the structural parts
consist of prefabricated units or prefabricated subassemblies. "Modular
or prefabricated home" does not include any mobile manufactured
home, as defined in section 21-64 of the general statutes;
(2) "Prefabricated subassembly" means a built-up combination of
several structural elements designed and fabricated as an assembled
section of wall, ceiling, floor or roof to be incorporated into a building
or structure by on-site erection of two or more such subassemblies;
(3) "Prefabricated unit" means a built-up section forming an
individual structural element of a building or structure, such as a beam,
girder, plank, strut, column or truss, the integrated parts of which are
prefabricated, including the necessary means for erection and
connection at the site to complete the structural frame;
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5395
(4) "Prefabricated unit service equipment" means mechanical units,
fixtures and accessories comprising a complete service unit of
mechanical equipment, including bathroom and kitchen plumbing
assemblies, unit heating and air conditioning systems and loop-wiring
assemblies of electric circuits which may be either prefabricated or
constructed on site; and
(5) "Prefabricated" means fabricated prior to erection or installation
in a building or structure.
(b) No zoning regulations adopted pursuant to section 8-2 of the
general statutes or any special act shall impose conditions and
requirements on any modular or prefabricated home or on lots
containing any such home if those conditions and requirements are
substantially different from conditions and requirements imposed by
the municipality on (1) single-family dwellings, or (2) lots containing
single-family dwellings.
(c) Upon the adoption of zoning regulations that allow for the
development of a modular or prefabricated home as described in
subsection (b) of this section, a municipality shall be awarded one-
quarter housing unit-equivalent point pursuant to subdivision (6) of
subsection (l) of section 8-30g of the general statutes, as amended by this
act, for each such unit for which a certificate of occupancy has been
issued by the municipality if such unit does not qualify for any other
housing unit-equivalent points pursuant to said subdivision.
Sec. 2. Subdivisions (6) and (7) of subsection (l) of section 8-30g of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(6) For the purposes of this subsection, housing unit-equivalent
points shall be determined by the commissioner as follows: (A) No
points shall be awarded for a unit unless its occupancy is restricted to
persons and families whose income is equal to or less than eighty per
cent of the median income, except that one-quarter point shall be
awarded for each (i) unrestricted [units] unit in a set-aside development,
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5395
[shall be awarded one-quarter point each, and] (ii) dwelling [units] unit
in a transit community middle housing [developments] development
developed pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 8-2s,
[shall be awarded one-quarter point each] and (iii) modular or
prefabricated home unit, as specified in subsection (b) of section 1 of this
act; (B) family units restricted to persons and families whose income is
equal to or less than eighty per cent of the median income shall be
awarded one point if an ownership unit and one and one-half points if
a rental unit; (C) family units restricted to persons and families whose
income is equal to or less than sixty per cent of the median income shall
be awarded one and one-half points if an ownership unit and two points
if a rental unit; (D) family units restricted to persons and families whose
income is equal to or less than forty per cent of the median income shall
be awarded two points if an ownership unit and two and one-half points
if a rental unit; (E) elderly units restricted to persons and families whose
income is equal to or less than eighty per cent of the median income shall
be awarded one-half point; (F) a set-aside development containing
family units which are rental units shall be awarded additional points
equal to twenty-two per cent of the total points awarded to such
development, provided the application for such development was filed
with the commission prior to July 6, 1995; (G) a mobile manufactured
home in a resident-owned mobile manufactured home park shall be
awarded points as follows: (i) One and one-half points when occupied
by persons and families with an income equal to or less than eighty per
cent of the median income, (ii) two points when occupied by persons
and families with an income equal to or less than sixty per cent of the
median income, and (iii) one-fourth point for the remaining units; and
(H) any unit described in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, of this
subdivision shall be awarded an additional one-quarter point, provided
such unit was constructed by or in conjunction with a housing authority,
as defined in section 8-40, of a neighboring municipality.
(7) [Points] Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (A) of
subdivision (6) of this subsection, points shall be awarded only for
dwelling units which (A) were newly-constructed units in an affordable
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5395
housing development, as that term was defined at the time of the
affordable housing application, for which a certificate of occupancy was
issued after July 1, 1990, (B) were newly subjected after July 1, 1990, to
deeds containing covenants or restrictions which require that, for at
least the duration required by subsection (a) of this section for set-aside
developments on the date when such covenants or restrictions took
effect, such dwelling units shall be sold or rented at, or below, prices
which will preserve the units as affordable housing for persons or
families whose income does not exceed eighty per cent of the median
income, or (C) are located in a resident-owned mobile manufactured
home park.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 8-30g(l)(6) and (7)
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4